Utah statutes.
20A-13-304.   Meeting to ballot -- Casting ballot for person not nominated by elector's party.

(1)  The electors shall meet at the office of the lieutenant governor at the state capitol at noon of the first Wednesday of the January after their election, or at noon of any other day designated by the Congress of the United States of America.

(2)  After convening, the electors shall perform their duties in conformity with the United States Constitution and laws.

(3)  Any elector who casts an electoral ballot for a person not nominated by the party of which he is an elector, except in the cases of death or felony conviction of a candidate, is considered to have resigned from the office of elector, his vote may not be recorded, and the remaining electors shall appoint another person to fill the vacancy.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

